Massachusetts, session 194th, H2856.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 100A of Chapter 32 of the Generals Laws, as appearing in the 2018 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the figures “$300,000” in line 8, inserting in 
place thereof the figure “$350,000”; and in said section by striking the figures “$300,000” in line 
21, inserting in place thereof the figure “$350,000”; and in said section by striking the figures 
“$300,000” in line 31, inserting in place thereof the figure “$350,000”; and in said section by 
striking the figures “$300,000” in line 32, inserting in place thereof the figure “$350,000” 
SECTION 2. Section 100 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “death”, in line 22, the following 
words:- provided, however, that for the purpose of any payment on or after January 1, 2023 the 
term amount of pension shall in no case be less than the full salary payable to a police officer in 

of 2 11 the next grade-step (in the case of a deceased police officer) or a firefighter in the next grade-step 
(in the case of a deceased firefighter) while employed by a department or uniformed force on the 
date of such employee's death. Provided further that for the purpose of any payment on or after 
January 1, 2023, the term amount of pension shall in no case be less than the earnings that would 
have been payable to a police superior officer were he or she in the next grade-step of a 
supervisory position (in the case of a police superior officer deceased on or after January 1, 2023 
who had been appointed to and was serving in such a supervisory position) or payable to a fire 
officer were he or she in the next grade-step of a supervisory position (in the case of a fire officer 
deceased on or after January 1, 2023 who had been appointed to and was serving in such a 
supervisory position) employed by a department or uniformed force on the date of such 
employee's death. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.